Utah statutes.
63H-1-201.   Creation of military installation development authority -- Status and powers of authority -- Limitation.

(1)  There is created a military installation development authority.

(2)  The authority is:

(a)  an independent, nonprofit, separate body corporate and politic, with perpetual succession and statewide jurisdiction, whose purpose is to facilitate the development of military land in a project area;

(b)  a political subdivision of the state; and

(c)  a public corporation, as defined in Section 63E-1-102.

(3)  The authority may:

(a)  as provided in this chapter, facilitate the development of land within one or more project areas, including the ongoing operation of facilities within a project area;

(b)  sue and be sued;

(c)  enter into contracts generally;

(d)  buy, obtain an option upon, or otherwise acquire any interest in real or personal property:

(i)  in a project area; or

(ii)  outside a project area for publicly owned infrastructure and improvements, if the board considers the purchase, option, or other interest acquisition to be necessary for fulfilling the authority's development objectives;

(e)  sell, convey, grant, dispose of by gift, or otherwise dispose of any interest in real or personal property;

(f)  enter into a lease agreement on real or personal property, either as lessee or lessor:

(i)  in a project area; or

(ii)  outside a project area, if the board considers the lease to be necessary for fulfilling the authority's development objectives;

(g)  provide for the development of land within a project area under one or more contracts;

(h)  exercise powers and perform functions under a contract, as authorized in the contract;

(i)  exercise exclusive police power within a project area to the same extent as though the authority were a municipality, including the collection of regulatory fees;

(j)  receive tax increment and other taxes and fees as provided in this chapter;

(k)  accept financial or other assistance from any public or private source for the authority's activities, powers, and duties, and expend any funds so received for any of the purposes of this chapter;

(l)  borrow money, contract with, or accept financial or other assistance from the federal government, a public entity, or any other source for any of the purposes of this chapter and comply with any conditions of the loan, contract, or assistance;

(m)  issue bonds to finance the undertaking of any development objectives of the authority, including bonds under Title 11, Chapter 17, Utah Industrial Facilities and Development Act, and bonds under Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act;

(n)  hire employees, including contract employees;

(o)  transact other business and exercise all other powers provided for in this chapter;

(p)  enter into a development agreement with a developer of land within a project area;

(q)  enter into an agreement with a political subdivision of the state under which the political subdivision provides one or more municipal services within a project area;

(r)  enter into an agreement with a private contractor to provide one or more municipal services within a project area;

(s)  exercise powers and perform functions that the authority is authorized by statute to exercise or perform; and

(t)  enter into an agreement with the federal government or an agency of the federal government under which the federal government or agency:

(i)  provides law enforcement services only to military land within a project area; and

(ii)  may enter into a mutual aid or other cooperative agreement with a law enforcement agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(4)  The authority may not itself provide law enforcement service or fire protection service within a project area but may enter into an agreement for one or both of those services, as provided in Subsection (3)(q).

